hu_hu.affix
SFX B e édékéig [^ae]e
SFX B e édékéiből [^ae]e
SFX B e édékéiben [^ae]e
SFX B e édékéibe [^ae]e
SFX B e édékéi [^ae]e
SFX B e édékéhez [^ae]e
SFX B e édékéből [^ae]e
SFX B e édékében [^ae]e
SFX B e édékébe [^ae]e
SFX B e édéké [^ae]e
SFX B e édéktől [^ae]e
SFX B e édékről [^ae]e
SFX B e édékre [^ae]e
SFX B e édéknél [^ae]e
SFX B e édéknek [^ae]e
SFX B e édékké [^ae]e
SFX B e édékkel [^ae]e
SFX B e édékig [^ae]e
SFX B e édékhez [^ae]e
SFX B e édéket [^ae]e
SFX B e édéken [^ae]e
SFX B e édékből [^ae]e
SFX B e édékben [^ae]e
SFX B e édékbe [^ae]e
SFX B e édék [^ae]e
SFX B e édéiül [^ae]e
SFX B e édéiért [^ae]e
SFX B e édéivé [^ae]e
SFX B e édéivel [^ae]e
SFX B e édéitől [^ae]e
SFX B e édéit [^ae]e
SFX B e édéiről [^ae]e
SFX B e édéire [^ae]e
SFX B e édéinél [^ae]e
SFX B e édéinek [^ae]e
SFX B e édéin [^ae]e
SFX B e édéiig [^ae]e
SFX B e édéihez [^ae]e
SFX B e édéig [^ae]e
SFX B e édéiből [^ae]e
SFX B e édéiben [^ae]e
SFX B e édéibe [^ae]e
SFX B e édéi [^ae]e
SFX B e édéhez [^ae]e
SFX B e édéből [^ae]e
SFX B e édében [^ae]e
SFX B e édébe [^ae]e
SFX B e édé [^ae]e
SFX B e édtől [^ae]e
SFX B e édről [^ae]e
SFX B e édre [^ae]e
SFX B e édnél [^ae]e
SFX B e édnek [^ae]e
SFX B e édként [^ae]e
SFX B e édkor [^ae]e
SFX B e édig [^ae]e
SFX B e édhez [^ae]e
SFX B e édet [^ae]e
SFX B e éden [^ae]e
SFX B e éddé [^ae]e
SFX B e éddel [^ae]e
SFX B e édből [^ae]e
SFX B e édben [^ae]e
SFX B e édbe [^ae]e
SFX B e éd/& [^ae]e
SFX B e éd [^ae]e
SFX B 0 éül [áéiíóőuúüűy-]
SFX B 0 éül [ae]e
SFX B 0 éért [áéiíóőuúüűy-]
SFX B 0 éért [ae]e
SFX B 0 évé [áéiíóőuúüűy-]
SFX B 0 évé [ae]e
SFX B 0 ével [áéiíóőuúüűy-]
SFX B 0 ével [ae]e
SFX B 0 étől [áéiíóőuúüűy-]
SFX B 0 étől [ae]e
SFX B 0 ét [áéiíóőuúüűy-]
SFX B 0 ét [ae]e
SFX B 0 éről [áéiíóőuúüűy-]
SFX B 0 éről [ae]e
SFX B 0 ére [áéiíóőuúüűy-]
SFX B 0 ére [ae]e
SFX B 0 énél [áéiíóőuúüűy-]
SFX B 0 énél [ae]e
SFX B 0 ének [áéiíóőuúüűy-]
SFX B 0 ének [ae]e
SFX B 0 én [áéiíóőuúüűy-]
SFX B 0 én [ae]e
SFX B 0 ékül [áéiíóőuúüűy-]
SFX B 0 ékül [ae]e
SFX B 0 ékéül [áéiíóőuúüűy-]
SFX B 0 ékéül [ae]e
SFX B 0 ékéért [áéiíóőuúüűy-]
SFX B 0 ékéért [ae]e
SFX B 0 ékévé [áéiíóőuúüűy-]
SFX B 0 ékévé [ae]e
SFX B 0 ékével [áéiíóőuúüűy-]
SFX B 0 ékével [ae]e
SFX B 0 ékétől [áéiíóőuúüűy-]
SFX B 0 ékétől [ae]e
SFX B 0 ékét [áéiíóőuúüűy-]
SFX B 0 ékét [ae]e
SFX B 0 ékéről [áéiíóőuúüűy-]
SFX B 0 ékéről [ae]e
SFX B 0 ékért [áéiíóőuúüűy-]
SFX B 0 ékért [ae]e
SFX B 0 ékére [áéiíóőuúüűy-]
SFX B 0 ékére [ae]e
SFX B 0 ékénél [áéiíóőuúüűy-]
SFX B 0 ékénél [ae]e
SFX B 0 ékének [áéiíóőuúüűy-]
SFX B 0 ékének [ae]e
SFX B 0 ékén [áéiíóőuúüűy-]
SFX B 0 ékén [ae]e
SFX B 0 ékéiül [áéiíóőuúüűy-]
SFX B 0 ékéiül [ae]e
SFX B 0 ékéiért [áéiíóőuúüűy-]
SFX B 0 ékéiért [ae]e
SFX B 0 ékéivé [áéiíóőuúüűy-]
SFX B 0 ékéivé [ae]e
SFX B 0 ékéivel [áéiíóőuúüűy-]
SFX B 0 ékéivel [ae]e
SFX B 0 ékéitől [áéiíóőuúüűy-]
SFX B 0 ékéitől [ae]e
SFX B 0 ékéit [áéiíóőuúüűy-]
SFX B 0 ékéit [ae]e
SFX B 0 ékéiről [áéiíóőuúüűy-]
SFX B 0 ékéiről [ae]e
SFX B 0 ékéire [áéiíóőuúüűy-]
SFX B 0 ékéire [ae]e
SFX B 0 ékéinél [áéiíóőuúüűy-]
SFX B 0 ékéinél [ae]e
SFX B 0 ékéinek [áéiíóőuúüűy-]
SFX B 0 ékéinek [ae]e
SFX B 0 ékéin [áéiíóőuúüűy-]
SFX B 0 ékéin [ae]e
SFX B 0 ékéiig [áéiíóőuúüűy-]
SFX B 0 ékéiig [ae]e
SFX B 0 ékéihez [áéiíóőuúüűy-]
SFX B 0 ékéihez [ae]e
SFX B 0 ékéig [áéiíóőuúüűy-]
SFX B 0 ékéig [ae]e
SFX B 0 ékéiből [áéiíóőuúüűy-]
SFX B 0 ékéiből [ae]e
SFX B 0 ékéiben [áéiíóőuúüűy-]
SFX B 0 ékéiben [ae]e
SFX B 0 ékéibe [áéiíóőuúüűy-]
SFX B 0 ékéibe [ae]e
SFX B 0 ékéi [áéiíóőuúüűy-]
SFX B 0 ékéi [ae]e
SFX B 0 ékéhez [áéiíóőuúüűy-]
SFX B 0 ékéhez [ae]e
SFX B 0 ékéből [áéiíóőuúüűy-]
SFX B 0 ékéből [ae]e
SFX B 0 ékében [áéiíóőuúüűy-]
SFX B 0 ékében [ae]e
SFX B 0 ékébe [áéiíóőuúüűy-]
SFX B 0 ékébe [ae]e
SFX B 0 éké [áéiíóőuúüűy-]
SFX B 0 éké [ae]e
SFX B 0 éktől [áéiíóőuúüűy-]
SFX B 0 éktől [ae]e
SFX B 0 ékről [áéiíóőuúüűy-]
SFX B 0 ékről [ae]e
SFX B 0 ékre [áéiíóőuúüűy-]
SFX B 0 ékre [ae]e
SFX B 0 éknél [áéiíóőuúüűy-]
SFX B 0 éknél [ae]e
SFX B 0 éknek [áéiíóőuúüűy-]
SFX B 0 éknek [ae]e
SFX B 0 ékké [áéiíóőuúüűy-]
SFX B 0 ékké [ae]e
SFX B 0 ékkel [áéiíóőuúüűy-]
SFX B 0 ékkel [ae]e
SFX B 0 ékig [áéiíóőuúüűy-]
SFX B 0 ékig [ae]e
SFX B 0 ékhez [áéiíóőuúüűy-]
SFX B 0 ékhez [ae]e
SFX B 0 éket [áéiíóőuúüűy-]
SFX B 0 éket [ae]e
SFX B 0 éken [áéiíóőuúüűy-]
SFX B 0 éken [ae]e
SFX B 0 ékből [áéiíóőuúüűy-]
SFX B 0 ékből [ae]e
SFX B 0 ékben [áéiíóőuúüűy-]
SFX B 0 ékben [ae]e
SFX B 0 ékbe [áéiíóőuúüűy-]
SFX B 0 ékbe [ae]e
SFX B 0 ék [áéiíóőuúüűy-]
SFX B 0 ék [ae]e
SFX B 0 éiül [áéiíóőuúüűy-]
SFX B 0 éiül [ae]e
SFX B 0 éiért [áéiíóőuúüűy-]
SFX B 0 éiért [ae]e
SFX B 0 éivé [áéiíóőuúüűy-]
SFX B 0 éivé [ae]e
SFX B 0 éivel [áéiíóőuúüűy-]
SFX B 0 éivel [ae]e
SFX B 0 éitől [áéiíóőuúüűy-]
SFX B 0 éitől [ae]e
SFX B 0 éit [áéiíóőuúüűy-]
SFX B 0 éit [ae]e
SFX B 0 éiről [áéiíóőuúüűy-]
SFX B 0 éiről [ae]e
SFX B 0 éire [áéiíóőuúüűy-]
SFX B 0 éire [ae]e
SFX B 0 éinél [áéiíóőuúüűy-]
SFX B 0 éinél [ae]e
SFX B 0 éinek [áéiíóőuúüűy-]
SFX B 0 éinek [ae]e
SFX B 0 éin [áéiíóőuúüűy-]
SFX B 0 éin [ae]e
SFX B 0 éiig [áéiíóőuúüűy-]
SFX B 0 éiig [ae]e
SFX B 0 éihez [áéiíóőuúüűy-]
SFX B 0 éihez [ae]e
SFX B 0 éig [áéiíóőuúüűy-]
SFX B 0 éig [ae]e
SFX B 0 éiből [áéiíóőuúüűy-]
SFX B 0 éiből [ae]e
SFX B 0 éiben [áéiíóőuúüűy-]
SFX B 0 éiben [ae]e
SFX B 0 éibe [áéiíóőuúüűy-]
SFX B 0 éibe [ae]e
SFX B 0 éi [áéiíóőuúüűy-]
SFX B 0 éi [ae]e
SFX B 0 éhez [áéiíóőuúüűy-]
SFX B 0 éhez [ae]e
SFX B 0 éből [áéiíóőuúüűy-]
SFX B 0 éből [ae]e
SFX B 0 ében [áéiíóőuúüűy-]
SFX B 0 ében [ae]e
SFX B 0 ébe [áéiíóőuúüűy-]
SFX B 0 ébe [ae]e
SFX B 0 é [áéiíóőuúüűy-]
SFX B 0 é [ae]e
SFX B 0 tekül [áéiíóőuúüűy-]
SFX B 0 tekül [ae]e
SFX B 0 tekéül [áéiíóőuúüűy-]
SFX B 0 tekéül [ae]e
SFX B 0 tekéért [áéiíóőuúüűy-]
SFX B 0 tekéért [ae]e
SFX B 0 tekévé [áéiíóőuúüűy-]
SFX B 0 tekévé [ae]e
SFX B 0 tekével [áéiíóőuúüűy-]
SFX B 0 tekével [ae]e
SFX B 0 tekétől [áéiíóőuúüűy-]
SFX B 0 tekétől [ae]e
SFX B 0 tekét [áéiíóőuúüűy-]
SFX B 0 tekét [ae]e
SFX B 0 tekéről [áéiíóőuúüűy-]
SFX B 0 tekéről [ae]e
SFX B 0 tekért [áéiíóőuúüűy-]
SFX B 0 tekért [ae]e
SFX B 0 tekére [áéiíóőuúüűy-]
SFX B 0 tekére [ae]e
SFX B 0 tekénél [áéiíóőuúüűy-]
SFX B 0 tekénél [ae]e
SFX B 0 tekének [áéiíóőuúüűy-]
SFX B 0 tekének [ae]e
SFX B 0 tekén [áéiíóőuúüűy-]
SFX B 0 tekén [ae]e
SFX B 0 tekéiül [áéiíóőuúüűy-]
SFX B 0 tekéiül [ae]e
SFX B 0 tekéiért [áéiíóőuúüűy-]
SFX B 0 tekéiért [ae]e
SFX B 0 tekéivé [áéiíóőuúüűy-]
SFX B 0 tekéivé [ae]e
SFX B 0 tekéivel [áéiíóőuúüűy-]
SFX B 0 tekéivel [ae]e
SFX B 0 tekéitől [áéiíóőuúüűy-]
SFX B 0 tekéitől [ae]e
SFX B 0 tekéit [áéiíóőuúüűy-]
SFX B 0 tekéit [ae]e
SFX B 0 tekéiről [áéiíóőuúüűy-]
SFX B 0 tekéiről [ae]e
SFX B 0 tekéire [áéiíóőuúüűy-]
SFX B 0 tekéire [ae]e
SFX B 0 tekéinél [áéiíóőuúüűy-]
SFX B 0 tekéinél [ae]e
SFX B 0 tekéinek [áéiíóőuúüűy-]
SFX B 0 tekéinek [ae]e
SFX B 0 tekéin [áéiíóőuúüűy-]
SFX B 0 tekéin [ae]e
SFX B 0 tekéiig [áéiíóőuúüűy-]
SFX B 0 tekéiig [ae]e
SFX B 0 tekéihez [áéiíóőuúüűy-]
SFX B 0 tekéihez [ae]e
SFX B 0 tekéig [áéiíóőuúüűy-]
SFX B 0 tekéig [ae]e
SFX B 0 tekéiből [áéiíóőuúüűy-]
SFX B 0 tekéiből [ae]e
SFX B 0 tekéiben [áéiíóőuúüűy-]
SFX B 0 tekéiben [ae]e
SFX B 0 tekéibe [áéiíóőuúüűy-]
SFX B 0 tekéibe [ae]e
SFX B 0 tekéi [áéiíóőuúüűy-]
SFX B 0 tekéi [ae]e
SFX B 0 tekéhez [áéiíóőuúüűy-]
SFX B 0 tekéhez [ae]e
SFX B 0 tekéből [áéiíóőuúüűy-]
SFX B 0 tekéből [ae]e
SFX B 0 tekében [áéiíóőuúüűy-]
SFX B 0 tekében [ae]e
SFX B 0 tekébe [áéiíóőuúüűy-]
SFX B 0 tekébe [ae]e
SFX B 0 teké [áéiíóőuúüűy-]
SFX B 0 teké [ae]e
SFX B 0 tektől [áéiíóőuúüűy-]
SFX B 0 tektől [ae]e
SFX B 0 tekről [áéiíóőuúüűy-]
SFX B 0 tekről [ae]e
SFX B 0 tekre [áéiíóőuúüűy-]
SFX B 0 tekre [ae]e
SFX B 0 teknél [áéiíóőuúüűy-]
SFX B 0 teknél [ae]e
SFX B 0 teknek [áéiíóőuúüűy-]
SFX B 0 teknek [ae]e
SFX B 0 tekként [áéiíóőuúüűy-]
SFX B 0 tekként [ae]e
SFX B 0 tekké [áéiíóőuúüűy-]
SFX B 0 tekké [ae]e
SFX B 0 tekkor [áéiíóőuúüűy-]
SFX B 0 tekkor [ae]e
SFX B 0 tekkel [áéiíóőuúüűy-]
SFX B 0 tekkel [ae]e
SFX B 0 tekig [áéiíóőuúüűy-]
SFX B 0 tekig [ae]e
SFX B 0 tekhez [áéiíóőuúüűy-]
