hu_hu.dict
ötvennégyezred/BVÜb)
ötvenkettőezred/BVÜb)
ötvenezer/ŐnBVÜjbc	
ökle/ŐBVRËŻjĐÓéčłÄäYc¸ź
életteli/ŐBVRËŻjĐÓéčłÄäYc¸ź
állóbüfé/ŐBVRËŻjĐÓéyČŔŕYcź
Ősi/ŐBVRËŻjĐÓqś,¸
Áltorjai/ŐBVRËŻjĐÓqČŔŕ,¸
zsemlye/ŐBVRËŻjĐÓéčłÄäYc¸ź
w-/BVRĐŃŐj)
virsli/ŐBVRËŻjĐÓéčłÄäYc¸ź
vecsernye/ŐBVRËŻjĐÓéčłÄäYc¸ź
vajaskifli/ŐBVRËŻjĐÓéyČŔŕYcź
törpe/ŐBVRËŻjĐÓéčłÄäYc¸ź
téveszme/ŐBVRËŻjĐÓéčłÄäYc¸ź
tsz-i/ŃĐŐBGVLTt)
tizennyolcezres/BŐVb)
tizenkettőezred/BVÜb)
tizenegyezres/BŐVb)
testvérke/ŐBVRËŻjĐÓéčłÄäYc¸ź
teke/ŐBVRËŻjĐÓéčłÄäYc¸ź
sütöde/ŐBVRËŻjĐÓéčłÄäYc¸ź
szüzsé/ŐBVRËŻjĐÓéčłÄäYc¸ź
széledt/XBDGV)
szigeteki/ŐBVRËŻjĐÓéčłÄäYc¸ź
szelence/ŐBVRËŻjĐÓéčłÄäYc¸ź
spray-s/Ó×nBGVLR)	ph:sprés
serkedt/XBDGV)
segédige/ŐBVRËŻjĐÓéyČŔŕYcź
révedt/XBDGV)
rigli/ŐBVRËŻjĐÓéčłÄäYc¸ź
rendkívüli/ŐBVRËŻjĐÓéčłÄäYc¸ź
re/ŐBVRËŻjĐÓčłÄäc¸ź
pukedli/ŐAUBVLQRĘŽËŻijĎĐÓáéçč˛łÄäĂăYcˇť¸ź
pilledt/XBDGV)
ottfeledt/BDGVX)
nyolcvanötezres/BŐVb)
nyolcvanhatezres/BŐVb)
negyvenötezred/BVÜb)
negyvenhatezred/BVÜb)
műszőrme/ŐBVRËŻjĐÓéyČŔŕYcź
mini/ŐBVRËŻjĐÓéčłÄäYc¸ź
mgtsz-i/ŃĐŐBGVLTt)
menettérti/ŐBVRËŻjĐÓéčłÄäYc¸ź
létszámfölötti/ŐBVRËŻjĐÓéčłÄäYc¸ź
legtettrekészebb/×nÓBLVR)	
kölönte/ŐBVRËŻjĐÓéčłÄäYc¸ź
kricsmi/ŐBVRËŻjĐÓéčłÄäYc¸ź
kilencvennégyezer/ŐnBVÜjbc	
kilencvenezer/ŐnBVÜjbc	
keszőce/ŐBVRËŻjĐÓéčłÄäYc¸ź
jérce/ŐBVRËŻjĐÓéčłÄäYc¸ź
idősb/BÔÝ×LVRD)
huszonnyolcezres/BŐVb)
huszonegyezres/BŐVb)
hetvenkilencezres/BŐVb)
henry/VËŻjŐBĐŃéčłÄäRc¸ź
hatvanhétezred/BVÜb)
harmincnégyezer/ŐnBVÜjbc	
harmincezer/ŐnBVÜjbc	
gyöngyvirágkörtike/ŐBVRËŻjĐÓéčłÄäYc¸ź
gebedt/XBDGV)
fényperje/ŐBVRËŻjĐÓéčłÄäYc¸ź
fene/ŐBVRËŻjĐÓéčłÄäYc¸ź
ezelőtti/BĐÓŐVR	
emse/ŐBVRËŻjĐÓéčłÄäYc¸ź
ebbeli/BŐĐÓGLVR
dermedt/XBDGV)
csipetke/ŐBVRËŻjĐÓéčłÄäYc¸ź
cl-es/Ó×nBGVLR)
búrkifli/ŐBVRËŻjĐÓéyČŔŕYcź
blöki/ŐBVRËŻjĐÓéčłÄäYc¸ź
bek.-es/Ó×nBGVLR)
ami/BVĐÓŐLR	
özönvízi/ąBÓŐĐGVËR
örömteli/ąBÓŐĐGVËR
éji/ąBÓŐĐGVËR
vegyészeti/ąBÓŐĐGVËR
tízhetenkénti/ąBÓŐĐGVËR
természetbeni/ąBÓŐĐGVËR
százévenkénti/ąBÓŐĐGVËR
szemernyi/ąBÓŐĐGVËR
semmiházi/°BÓŐĐGVËR
picinyke/ąBÓŐĐGVËR
négyhavi/°BÓŐĐGVËR
nyelvi/ąBÓŐĐGVËR
nagyobbféle/ąBÓŐĐGVËR
milliórendbeli/ąBÓŐĐGVËR
megszégyenítve/ąBÓŐĐGVËR
lelki/ąBÓŐĐGVËR
kétheti/ąBÓŐĐGVËR
kilencévi/ąBÓŐĐGVËR
kenti/ąBÓŐĐGVËR
ifjonti/°BÓŐĐGVËR
hétévenkénti/ąBÓŐĐGVËR
hifi/ąBÓŐĐGVËR
hatvanrendbeli/ąBÓŐĐGVËR
hararei/BÓŐĐGVËR
földközi/ąBÓŐĐGVËR
felekezetnélküli/ąBÓŐĐGVËR
erőművészi/ąBÓŐĐGVËR
egyheti/ąBÓŐĐGVËR
csiricsáré/ąBÓŐĐGVËR
belépti/ąBÓŐĐGVËR
Szunda-szigeteki/BÓŐĐGVËR
Zrínyi/ŐBVRËŻjĐÓqŕ,¸
Wény/VËŻjŐBĐŃqČŔŕR,¸
Vázsonyi/ŐBVRËŻjĐÓqČŔŕ,¸
Viki/ŐBVRËŻjĐÓqČŔŕ,¸
VPN-es/Ó×nBGVLR)
Töltéssy/VËŻjŐBĐŃqČŔŕR,¸l
Tormafölde/ŐBVRËŻjĐÓqś,¸
Tessitori/ŐBVRËŻjĐÓqČŔŕ,¸
Tarkői/ŐBVRËŻjĐÓqČŔŕ,¸
Sármezey/VËŻjŐBĐŃqČŔŕR,¸l
Széchényi/ŐBVRËŻjĐÓqČŔŕ,¸
Szinpetri/ŐBVRËŻjĐÓqś,¸
Szente/ŐBVRËŻjĐÓqś,¸
Szaloniki/ŐBVRËŻjĐÓqś,¸
Skalnitzky/VËŻjŐBĐŃqČŔŕR,¸l
Sartori/ŐBVRËŻjĐÓqČŔŕ,¸
Rőzse/ŐBVRËŻjĐÓqČŔŕ,¸
Romagnoli/ŐBVRËŻjĐÓqČŔŕ,¸
Rangoni/ŐBVRËŻjĐÓqČŔŕ,¸
Pédery/VËŻjŐBĐŃqČŔŕR,¸l
Polonyi/ŐBVRËŻjĐÓqČŔŕ,¸
Peterdy/VËŻjŐBĐŃqČŔŕR,¸l
Parlaghi/ŐBVRËŻjĐÓqČŔŕ,¸
OTP-/BVRĐŃŐj)
Nirschy/VËŻjŐBĐŃqČŔŕR,¸
Nagykereki/ŐBVRËŻjĐÓqś,¸
Mucskai/ŐBVRËŻjĐÓqČŔŕ,¸
Mihálygerge/ŐBVRËŻjĐÓqś,¸
Mecséry/VËŻjŐBĐŃqČŔŕR,¸l
Majerszky/VËŻjŐBĐŃqČŔŕR,¸l
MDNP-s/Ó×nBGVLR)
Lontai/ŐBVRËŻjĐÓqČŔŕ,¸
Lefcvre/ŐBVRËŻjĐÓqČŔŕ,¸
Kövesligethy/VËŻjŐBĐŃqČŔŕR,¸l
Kérészy/VËŻjŐBĐŃqČŔŕR,¸l
Kremeneczky/VËŻjŐBĐŃqČŔŕR,¸l
Klestinszky/VËŻjŐBĐŃqČŔŕR,¸l
Kerny/VËŻjŐBĐŃqČŔŕR,¸
Kbt.-/BVRĐŃŐj)
KDE-s/Ó×nBGVLR)
Ivánfi/ŐBVRËŻjĐÓqČŔŕ,¸
Iklódbördőce/ŐBVRËŻjĐÓqś,¸
Hpt.-i/ŃĐŐBGVLTt)
Heresznye/ŐBVRËŻjĐÓqś,¸
Haberle/ŐBVRËŻjĐÓqČŔŕ,¸
Gálfi/ŐBVRËŻjĐÓqČŔŕ,¸
Gyarmathi/ŐBVRËŻjĐÓqČŔŕ,¸
Gerse/ŐBVRËŻjĐÓqś,¸
GTP-/BVRĐŃŐj)
Frédi/ŐBVRËŻjĐÓqČŔŕ,¸
Felsőbüki/ŐBVRËŻjĐÓqČŔŕ,¸
Etv.-i/ŃĐŐBGVLTt)
Enyedy/VËŻjŐBĐŃqČŔŕR,¸l
EP-s/Ó×nBGVLR)
Duplinszky/VËŻjŐBĐŃqČŔŕR,¸l
Detti/ŐBVRËŻjĐÓqČŔŕ,¸
Dabrónaki/ŐBVRËŻjĐÓqČŔŕ,¸
Czele/ŐBVRËŻjĐÓqČŔŕ,¸
Csjt.-s/Ó×nBGVLR)
Csekey/VËŻjŐBĐŃqČŔŕR,¸l
CD-RW-/BVRĐŃŐj)
Bázakerettye/ŐBVRËŻjĐÓqś,¸
Bredeczky/VËŻjŐBĐŃqČŔŕR,¸l
Bisse/ŐBVRËŻjĐÓqś,¸
Berkeley/VËŻjŐBĐŃqČŔŕR,¸l	ph:börkli
Bege/ŐBVRËŻjĐÓqČŔŕ,¸
Bakki/ŐBVRËŻjĐÓqČŔŕ,¸
B-s/Ó×nBGVLR
Alsónémedi/ŐBVRËŻjĐÓqś,¸
ACPI-s/Ó×nBGVLR)
4.-es/Ó×nBGVLR1)
10-e/BVÓŐĐś)
